Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 4. State Forest System.

Sec. 41.17.200.
State forest purposes and management.

The purpose of AS

41.17.200

—

41.17.230

is to permit the establishment of designated state-owned or acquired land and water areas as state forests. The primary purpose in the establishment of state forests is timber management that provides for the production, utilization, and replenishment of timber resources while allowing other beneficial uses of public land and resources.

In managing a state forest, the commissioner shall, consistent with the primary purpose of a state forest under (a) of this section, restrict the public use of the land and its resources, including timber, fish and wildlife, and minerals, only when necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1983; am §§ 7, 8 ch 122 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Sec. 41.17.210.
State forests.

The governor may propose to the legislature the establishment of state forests consisting primarily of commercially valuable forest land determined by the governor to be necessary for retention in state ownership for management under the principles of multiple use and sustained yield and consistent with AS

38.04.005

. The proposal of the governor must include a report and recommendations of the commissioner including

a preliminary forest inventory;

a summary of the testimony offered at public hearings held on the management of the proposed state forest in communities proximately located to a proposed state forest;

[Repealed, § 16 ch 153 SLA 2003.]

[Repealed, § 16 ch 153 SLA 2003.]

an estimate of the cost of a full implementation of an operational level forest inventory and the management plan.

A state forest established by the legislature shall be retained in state ownership.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1983; am § 22 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 122 SLA 1996; am § 16 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The provisions of Title 38 regarding acquisition, management, and disposal of state land do not apply to land withdrawn from the state public domain as a state park or recreation area. Title 38 does apply to state forests, except that land in a state forest may not be conveyed to a third party and is subject to limitations on other types of state land disposals.
February 21, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 41.17.220.
Management of state forests.

Land within a state forest or within a unit of a state forest shall be managed under

the sustained yield principle;

this chapter; and

a forest management plan prepared by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1983; am § 12 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Sec. 41.17.230.
Management plans.

The commissioner shall prepare a forest management plan consistent with AS

38.04.005

and this chapter for each state forest and for each unit of a state forest to assist in meeting the requirements of this chapter. An operational level forest inventory shall be completed before a forest management plan for the state forest or the unit of a state forest is adopted. The forest management plan shall be adopted, implemented, and maintained within three years of the establishment of a state forest by the legislature. To the extent they are found to be compatible with the primary purpose of state forests under AS

41.17.200

, the forest management plan must consider and permit uses of forest land for nontimber purposes, including recreation, tourism, mining, mineral exploration, mineral leasing, material extraction, consumptive and nonconsumptive uses of wildlife and fish, grazing and other agricultural activities, and other traditional uses. If the commissioner finds that a permitted use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of a state forest, the commissioner shall affirmatively state in the management plan that finding of incompatibility for the specific area where the incompatibility is anticipated to exist and the time period when the incompatibility is anticipated to exist together with the reasons and benefits for each finding.

The commissioner shall review and revise a forest management plan when necessary.

A management plan may not be adopted or revised after the establishment of the state forest without prior review by the Board of Forestry and by other appropriate state agencies or without prior public hearings held in a community proximately located to the state forest or to a unit of a state forest.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 153 SLA 2003.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 34 SLA 1990.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 34 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1983; am § 34 ch 34 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 122 SLA 1996; am §§ 13, 14, 16 ch 153 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For current law on forest land use plans and on permissible uses formerly set out in this section, see AS

38.05.112

.